Illinois, session 104th, SB3350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 5finds that:6    (1) the Illinois Department of Corrections operates over 720 adult correctional centers as well as boot camps, work 8camps and adult transition centers throughout the State, 9employs approximately 13,000 employees, and is responsible for 10the management of nearly 30,000 adult committed persons;11    (2) committed person mail is a primary entry point for 12smuggling drugs into correctional institutions and facilities, 13with tainted mail incidents on the rise;14    (3) elimination of dangerous contraband, including 15synthetic drugs, in mail is essential to protecting the health 16and safety of employees and committed persons within the 17Department;18    (4) correctional institutions and facilities of the 19Department are becoming increasingly dangerous, with a rise in 20drug exposures in recent years;21    (5) the introduction of synthetic drugs, particularly 22fentanyl and fentanyl analogs, into correctional institutions 23and facilities by mail threatens employees, committed persons, 24and the security of correctional institutions and facilities;  SB3350- 2 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1    (6) the foregoing factors add tremendous pressures and 2workloads that further burden existing employees;3    (7) employees at correctional institutions and facilities 4as well as AFSCME continue to request drug interdiction 5technologies to protect themselves and committed persons; and6    (8) apart from digital mail scanning, there is no widely 7deployed interdiction technology to detect fentanyl, and other 8synthetic drugs, arriving through the mail at Department 9institutions and facilities. 10    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 11changing Section 3-7-2 and by adding Section 3-7-2.1 as 12follows: 13    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-7-2)14    Sec. 3-7-2. Facilities. 15    (a) All institutions and facilities of the Department 16shall provide every committed person with access to toilet 17facilities, barber facilities, bathing facilities at least 18once each week, a library of legal materials and published 19materials including newspapers and magazines approved by the 20Director. A committed person may not receive any materials 21that the Director deems pornographic.22    (b) (Blank).23    (c) All institutions and facilities of the Department 24shall provide facilities for every committed person to leave   SB3350- 3 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1his cell for at least one hour each day unless the chief 2administrative officer determines that it would be harmful or 3dangerous to the security or safety of the institution or 4facility.5    (d) All institutions and facilities of the Department 6shall provide every committed person with a wholesome and 7nutritional diet at regularly scheduled hours, drinking water, 8clothing adequate for the season, including underwear, 9bedding, soap, towels, and medical and dental care. Underwear 10provided to each committed person in all institutions and 11facilities of the Department shall be free of charge and shall 12be provided at any time upon request, including multiple 13requests, of the committed person or as needed by the 14committed person.15    (e) All institutions and facilities of the Department 16shall permit every committed person to send and receive an 17unlimited number of uncensored letters, provided, however, 18that the Director shall may order that mail be inspected, 19electronically scanned, and read for reasons of the security, 20safety, or morale of the institution or facility.21    (f) All of the institutions and facilities of the 22Department shall permit every committed person to receive 23in-person visitors and video contact, if available, except in 24case of abuse of the visiting privilege or when the chief 25administrative officer determines that such visiting would be 26harmful or dangerous to the security, safety or morale of the   SB3350- 4 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1institution or facility. Each committed person is entitled to 27 visits per month. Every committed person may submit a list of 3at least 30 persons to the Department that are authorized to 4visit the committed person. The list shall be kept in an 5electronic format by the Department beginning on August 1, 62019, as well as available in paper form for Department 7employees. The chief administrative officer shall have the 8right to restrict visitation to non-contact visits, video, or 9other forms of non-contact visits for reasons of safety, 10security, and order, including, but not limited to, 11restricting contact visits for committed persons engaged in 12gang activity. No committed person in a super maximum security 13facility or on disciplinary segregation is allowed contact 14visits. Any committed person found in possession of illegal 15drugs or who fails a drug test shall not be permitted contact 16visits for a period of at least 6 months. Any committed person 17involved in gang activities or found guilty of assault 18committed against a Department employee shall not be permitted 19contact visits for a period of at least 6 months. The 20Department shall offer every visitor appropriate written 21information concerning HIV and AIDS, including information 22concerning how to contact the Illinois Department of Public 23Health for counseling information. The Department shall 24develop the written materials in consultation with the 25Department of Public Health. The Department shall ensure that 26all such information and materials are culturally sensitive   SB3350- 5 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1and reflect cultural diversity as appropriate. Implementation 2of the changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-629 is 3subject to appropriation. The Department shall seek the lowest 4possible cost to provide video calling and shall charge to the 5extent of recovering any demonstrated costs of providing video 6calling. The Department shall not make a commission or profit 7from video calling services. Nothing in this Section shall be 8construed to permit video calling instead of in-person 9visitation. 10    (f-5) (Blank).11    (f-10) The Department may not restrict or limit in-person 12visits to committed persons due to the availability of 13interactive video conferences.14    (f-15)(1) The Department shall issue a standard written 15policy for each institution and facility of the Department 16that provides for:17        (A) the number of in-person visits each committed 18    person is entitled to per week and per month including the 19    requirements of subsection (f) of this Section;20        (B) the hours of in-person visits;21        (C) the type of identification required for visitors 22    at least 18 years of age; and23        (D) the type of identification, if any, required for 24    visitors under 18 years of age. 25    (2) This policy shall be posted on the Department website 26and at each facility.  SB3350- 6 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1    (3) The Department shall post on its website daily any 2restrictions or denials of visitation for that day and the 3succeeding 5 calendar days, including those based on a 4lockdown of the facility, to inform family members and other 5visitors. 6    (g) All institutions and facilities of the Department 7shall permit religious ministrations and sacraments to be 8available to every committed person, but attendance at 9religious services shall not be required. This subsection (g) 10is subject to the provisions of the Faith Behind Bars Act.11    (h) Within 90 days after December 31, 1996, the Department 12shall prohibit the use of curtains, cell-coverings, or any 13other matter or object that obstructs or otherwise impairs the 14line of vision into a committed person's cell.15    (i) A point of contact person appointed under subsection 16(u-6) of Section 3-2-2 of this Code shall promptly and 17efficiently review suggestions, complaints, and other requests 18made by visitors to institutions and facilities of the 19Department and by other members of the public. Based on the 20nature of the submission, the point of contact person shall 21communicate with the appropriate division of the Department, 22disseminate the concern or complaint, and act as liaison 23between the parties to reach a resolution.24        (1) The point of contact person shall maintain 25    information about the subject matter of each 26    correspondence, including, but not limited to, information   SB3350- 7 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1    about the following subjects:2            (A) the parties making the submission;3            (B) any commissary-related concerns;4            (C) any concerns about the institution or 5        facility's COVID-19 protocols and mitigations;6            (D) any concerns about mail, video, or electronic 7        messages or other communications with incarcerated 8        persons;9            (E) any concerns about the institution or 10        facility;11            (F) any discipline-related concerns;12            (G) any concerns about earned sentencing credits;13            (H) any concerns about educational opportunities 14        for incarcerated persons;15            (I) any concerns about health-related matters;16            (J) any mental health concerns;17            (K) any concerns about personal property;18            (L) any concerns about the records of the 19        incarcerated person;20            (M) any concerns about recreational opportunities 21        for incarcerated persons;22            (N) any staffing-related concerns;23            (O) any concerns about the transfer of individuals 24        in custody;25            (P) any concerns about visitation; and26            (Q) any concerns about work opportunities for   SB3350- 8 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1        incarcerated persons.2        The information shall be maintained in accordance with 3    standards set by the Department of Corrections, and shall 4    be made available to the Department's Planning and 5    Research Division. The point of contact person shall 6    provide a summary of the results of the review, including 7    any resolution or recommendations made as a result of 8    correspondence with the Planning and Research Division of 9    the Department.10        (2) The Department shall provide an annual written 11    report to the General Assembly and the Governor, with the 12    first report due no later than January 1, 2023, and 13    publish the report on its website within 48 hours after 14    the report is transmitted to the Governor and the General 15    Assembly. The report shall include a summary of activities 16    undertaken and completed as a result of submissions to the 17    point of contact person. The Department of Corrections 18    shall collect and report the following aggregated and 19    disaggregated data for each institution and facility and 20    describe:21            (A) the work of the point of contact person;22            (B) the general nature of suggestions, complaints, 23        and other requests submitted to the point of contact 24        person;25            (C) the volume of emails, calls, letters, and 26        other correspondence received by the point of contact   SB3350- 9 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1        person;2            (D) the resolutions reached or recommendations 3        made as a result of the point of contact person's 4        review;5            (E) whether, if an investigation is recommended, a 6        report of the complaint was forwarded to the Chief 7        Inspector of the Department or other Department 8        employee, and the resolution of the complaint, and if 9        the investigation has not concluded, a detailed status 10        report on the complaint; and11            (F) any recommendations that the point of contact 12        person has relating to systemic issues in the 13        Department of Corrections, and any other matters for 14        consideration by the General Assembly and the 15        Governor.16        The name, address, or other personally identifiable 17    information of a person who files a complaint, suggestion, 18    or other request with the point of contact person, and 19    confidential records shall be redacted from the annual 20    report and are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 21    of Information Act. The Department shall disclose the 22    records only if required by a court order on a showing of 23    good cause.24        (3) The Department must post in a conspicuous place in 25    the waiting area of every facility or institution a sign 26    that contains in bold, black type the following:  SB3350- 10 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1            (A) a short statement notifying visitors of the 2        point of contact person and that person's duty to 3        receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests; 4        and5            (B) information on how to submit suggestions, 6        complaints, or other requests to the point of contact 7        person. 8    (j) Menstrual hygiene products shall be available, as 9needed, free of charge, at all institutions and facilities of 10the Department for all committed persons who menstruate. In 11this subsection (j), "menstrual hygiene products" means 12tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the 13menstrual cycle. 14(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-331, eff. 1-1-24; 15104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 16    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2.1 new)17    Sec. 3-7-2.1. Electronic scanning of committed person 18mail.19    (a) Scanning and interdiction of synthetic drugs and 20contraband in postal mail. The Department shall achieve 100% 21scanning capacity of all mail arriving at each correctional 22institution and facility not later than 180 days after the 23effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 24Assembly.25    (b) Means to achieve interdiction. The Department shall   SB3350- 11 -LRB104 18776 RLC 32219 b1utilize all means necessary to achieve synthetic drug 2interdiction in order to:3        (1) protect staff and committed persons from exposure 4    to synthetic drugs and opioids introduced to correctional 5    institutions and facilities through the mail; and6        (2) ensure that after a piece of mail is received at a 7    correctional institution or facility, each committed 8    person receives a digital copy of any mail that is 9    addressed to the committed person.10    (c) Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules regarding 11the delivery of mail and mail scanning services necessary to 12achieve the scanning capacity described in subsection (a).13    (d) Annual reports. Beginning one year after the date on 14which the strategy is achieved and each year thereafter, the 15Director of Corrections shall submit to the Governor and 16General Assembly a report on the total quantity of detected 17synthetic drugs and opioids.